Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202669-2442
Injury to person or damage to property; permitholder; report required; violation; penalty.

(1) Any time the discharge of a handgun carried by a permitholder pursuant to the Concealed Handgun Permit Act results in injury to a person or damage to property, the permitholder shall make a report of such incident to the Nebraska State Patrol on a form designed and distributed by the Nebraska State Patrol. The information from the report shall be maintained as provided in section 69-2444.

(2) A violation of this section is a Class III misdemeanor for a first offense and a Class I misdemeanor for any second or subsequent offense.

Laws 2006, LB 454, § 16;

Laws 2023, LB77, § 20.